New York, session 2025-2026, A9084.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 162 of the state finance law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. Preferred status for bids. a. Preferred status, as prescribed in 4 this section, shall be accorded to bids where such bid's commodities or 5 services are produced by a company whose headquarters and primary busi- 6 ness presence are located in New York state and such bid was within five 7 percent of the winning bid. A company's primary business presence is 8 located in New York state when it realizes more than fifty percent of 9 its combined gross revenues from business activity generated in New York 10 state and has more than fifty percent of its full-time equivalent 11 employees employed in New York state. 12 b. When preferred status is given to multiple bids, the best preferred 13 status bid shall be considered the winning bid. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 15 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08234-01-5